Arkansas, session 2025, HB1527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 28-65-311(c)(1), concerning permissible
investments a guardian of the estate may make without a court order, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(I) An Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan, created under
the Arkansas Brighter Future Fund Plan Act, § 6-84-101 et seq.











*LJH158*
02/19/2025 12:42:23 PM LJH158